Utah statutes.
17-41-401.   Farmland Assessment Act benefits not affected.

(1)  Creation of an agriculture protection area may not impair the ability of land within the area to obtain the benefits of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act.

(2)  The eligibility of land for the benefits of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act, shall be determined exclusively by the provisions of that act, notwithstanding the land's location within an agriculture protection area.

